assn1/english.lexc
!!!english.lexc!!!
! Benjamin Prud'homme, March 4, 2021, bprudhomme@vassar.edu

Multichar_Symbols +N +V +PastPart +Past +PresPart +3P +Sg +Pl +Adj +Comp +Supl +Adv

LEXICON Root

Noun 	  ;
Verb 	  ;
Adjective ;

LEXICON Noun

cat  	Ninf;
city 	Ninf;
fox     Ninf;
panic	Ninf;
try  	Ninf;
watch 	Ninf;
panda 	Ninf;
bus   	Ninf;
library	Ninf;
mouse	Ninf;
child	Ninf;
cactus  Ninf;
octopus Ninf;

LEXICON Verb

beg     Vinf;
fox     Vinf;
make    Vinf;
panic   Vinf;
try     Vinf;
watch   Vinf;
walk    Vinf;
debate	Vinf;
study	Vinf;
stop	Vinf;
nod	Vinf;
fold	Vinf;
write	Vinf;
drink	Vinf;
sneak	Vinf;

LEXICON Adjective

slow		Ainf;
cool		Ainf;
fine		Ainf;
beautiful	A3inf;
excellent	A3inf;

LEXICON Ninf

+N+Sg:0   #;
+N+Pl:^s  #;

LEXICON Vinf

+V:0             #;
+V+3P+Sg:^s      #;
+V+Past:^ed      #;
+V+PastPart:^ed  #;
+V+PresPart:^ing #;
^able:^able	 A3inf;

LEXICON Ainf

+Adj:0		#;
+Adj+Comp:^er	#;
+Adj+Supl:^est	#;
^ly:^ly		AVinf;

LEXICON A3inf

+Adj:0		#;
^ly:^ly		AVinf;

LEXICON AVinf
+Adv:0		#;
